Missouri, session 2026, SB1483.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 160.054, 160.055, 160.415, 162.301,
162.411, 162.511, 162.531, 162.700, 162.890, 163.011, 164.131,
164.161, 164.191, 164.201, 164.221, 164.261, 164.301, 165.141,
170.014, 177.073, 177.086, and 177.091, RSMo, are repealed and
twenty-one new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as
sections 160.054, 160.055, 160.415, 162.301, 162.411, 162.511,
162.531, 162.700, 162.890, 163.011, 164.131, 164.161, 164.191,
164.201, 164.261, 164.301, 165.141, 170.014, 177.073, 177.086,
and 177.091, to read as follows:
160.054. 1. Notwithstanding any provisions of
sections 160.051 and 160.053[,] to the contrary, [beginning
with the 1997-98 school year,] all metropolitan school
districts and all charter schools, except as provided in
subsection 2 of this section, may establish and enforce a
regulation which requires that a child shall have attained
the age of three by August first for purposes of
prekindergarten if a school district or charter school
maintains such a program, the age of five for purposes of
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1483 2
kindergarten and summer school prior to a kindergarten
school term, and the age of six for purposes of grade one,
on or before any date between August first and October first
of that year. The school district or charter school shall
receive state aid for any child admitted to kindergarten,
summer school prior to kindergarten, or grade one pursuant
to this section, notwithstanding the provisions of section
160.051.
2. Any kindergarten or grade one pupil beginning the
school term and any pupil beginning summer school prior to a
kindergarten school term in a metropolitan school district
or charter school and subsequently transferring to another
school district in this state in which the child's birth
date would preclude such child's eligibility for entrance
shall be deemed eligible for attendance and shall not be
required to meet the minimum age requirements. The
receiving school district shall receive state aid for the
child, notwithstanding the provisions of section 160.051.
3. Any child who completes the kindergarten year in a
metropolitan school district or charter school shall not be
required to meet the minimum age requirements of another
school district in this state for entrance into grade one.
4. The provisions of subsections 1 and 2 of this
section, relating to kindergarten instruction and state aid
therefor, shall not apply during any particular school year
to those districts or charter schools which do not provide
kindergarten classes that year.
160.055. 1. Notwithstanding any provisions of
sections 160.051 and 160.053[,] to the contrary, [beginning
with the 1997-98 school year,] all charter schools and all
urban school districts containing the greater part of the
population of a city which has more than three hundred

SB 1483 3
thousand inhabitants, except as provided in subsection 2 of
this section, may establish and enforce a regulation which
requires that a child shall have attained the age of three
by August first for purposes of prekindergarten if a school
district maintains such a program, the age of five for
purposes of kindergarten and summer school prior to a
kindergarten school term, and the age of six for purposes of
grade one, on or before any date between August first and
October first of that year. The school district or charter
school shall receive state aid for any child admitted to
kindergarten, summer school prior to kindergarten, or grade
one pursuant to this section, notwithstanding the provisions
of section 160.051.
2. Any kindergarten or grade one pupil beginning the
school term and any pupil beginning summer school prior to a
kindergarten school term in a charter school or an urban
school district in this state containing the greater part of
the population of a city which has more than three hundred
thousand inhabitants and subsequently transferring to
another school district in this state in which the child's
birth date would preclude such child's eligibility for
entrance shall be deemed eligible for attendance and shall
not be required to meet the minimum age requirements. The
receiving school district shall receive state aid for the
child, notwithstanding the provisions of section 160.051.
3. Any child who completes the kindergarten year in a
charter school or an urban school district containing the
greater part of the population of a city which has more than
three hundred thousand inhabitants shall not be required to
meet the minimum age requirements of another school district
in this state for entrance into grade one.

SB 1483 4
4. The provisions of subsections 1 and 2 of this
section, relating to kindergarten instruction and state aid
therefor, shall not apply during any particular school year
to those districts or charter schools which do not provide
kindergarten classes that year.
160.415. 1. For the purposes of calculation and
distribution of state school aid under section 163.031,
pupils enrolled in a charter school shall be included in the
pupil enrollment of the school district within which each
pupil resides. Each charter school shall report the
eligibility for free and reduced price lunch, special
education, or limited English proficiency status, as well as
eligibility for categorical aid, of pupils resident in a
school district who are enrolled in the charter school to
the school district in which those pupils reside. The
charter school shall report the average daily attendance
data, free and reduced price lunch count, special education
pupil count, and limited English proficiency pupil count to
the state department of elementary and secondary education.
Each charter school shall promptly notify the state
department of elementary and secondary education and the
pupil's school district when a pupil discontinues enrollment
at a charter school.
2. Except as provided in subsections 3 and 4 of this
section, the aid payments for charter schools shall be as
described in this subsection.
(1) A school district having one or more resident
pupils attending a charter school shall pay to the charter
school an annual amount equal to the product of the charter
school's weighted average daily attendance and the state
adequacy target, multiplied by the dollar value modifier for
the district, plus local tax revenues per weighted average

SB 1483 5
daily attendance from the incidental and teachers' funds in
excess of the performance levy as defined in section 163.011
plus all other state aid attributable to such pupils.
(2) The district of residence of a pupil attending a
charter school shall also pay to the charter school any
other federal or state aid that the district receives on
account of such pupil.
(3) If the department overpays or underpays the amount
due to the charter school, such overpayment or underpayment
shall be repaid by the charter school or credited to the
charter school in twelve equal payments in the next fiscal
year.
(4) The amounts provided pursuant to this subsection
shall be prorated for partial year enrollment for a pupil.
(5) A school district shall pay the amounts due
pursuant to this subsection as the disbursal agent and no
later than twenty days following the receipt of any such
funds. The department of elementary and secondary education
shall pay the amounts due when it acts as the disbursal
agent within five days of the required due date.
3. A workplace charter school shall receive payment
for each eligible pupil as provided under subsection 2 of
this section, except that if the pupil is not a resident of
the district and is participating in a voluntary
interdistrict transfer program, the payment for such pupils
shall be the same as provided under section 162.1060.
4. A charter school that has declared itself as a
local educational agency shall receive from the department
of elementary and secondary education an annual amount equal
to the product of the charter school's weighted average
daily attendance and the state adequacy target, multiplied
by the dollar value modifier for the district, plus local

SB 1483 6
tax revenues per weighted average daily attendance from the
incidental and teachers funds in excess of the performance
levy as defined in section 163.011 plus all other state aid
attributable to such pupils. If a charter school declares
itself as a local educational agency, the department of
elementary and secondary education shall, upon notice of the
declaration, reduce the payment made to the school district
by the amount specified in this subsection and pay directly
to the charter school the annual amount reduced from the
school district's payment.
5. If a school district fails to make timely payments
of any amount for which it is the disbursal agent, the state
department of elementary and secondary education shall
authorize payment to the charter school of the amount due
pursuant to subsection 2 of this section and shall deduct
the same amount from the next state school aid apportionment
to the owing school district. If a charter school is paid
more or less than the amounts due pursuant to this section,
the amount of overpayment or underpayment shall be adjusted
equally in the next twelve payments by the school district
or the department of elementary and secondary education, as
appropriate. Any dispute between the school district and a
charter school as to the amount owing to the charter school
shall be resolved by the department of elementary and
secondary education, and the department's decision shall be
the final administrative action for the purposes of review
pursuant to chapter 536. During the period of dispute, the
department of elementary and secondary education shall make
every administrative and statutory effort to allow the
continued education of students in their current charter
school setting.

SB 1483 7
6. The charter school and a local school board may
agree by contract for services to be provided by the school
district to the charter school. The charter school may
contract with any other entity for services. Such services
may include but are not limited to food service, custodial
service, maintenance, management assistance, curriculum
assistance, media services and libraries and shall be
subject to negotiation between the charter school and the
local school board or other entity. Documented actual costs
100 of such services shall be paid for by the charter school.
101 7. In the case of a proposed charter school that
102 intends to contract with an education service provider for
103 substantial educational services or management services, the
104 request for proposals shall additionally require the charter
105 school applicant to:
106 (1) Provide evidence of the education service
107 provider's success in serving student populations similar to
108 the targeted population, including demonstrated academic
109 achievement as well as successful management of nonacademic
110 school functions, if applicable;
111 (2) Provide a term sheet setting forth the proposed
112 duration of the service contract; roles and responsibilities
113 of the governing board, the school staff, and the service
114 provider; scope of services and resources to be provided by
115 the service provider; performance evaluation measures and
116 time lines; compensation structure, including clear
117 identification of all fees to be paid to the service
118 provider; methods of contract oversight and enforcement;
119 investment disclosure; and conditions for renewal and
120 termination of the contract;

SB 1483 8
121 (3) Disclose any known conflicts of interest between
122 the school governing board and proposed service provider or
123 any affiliated business entities;
124 (4) Disclose and explain any termination or nonrenewal
125 of contracts for equivalent services for any other charter
126 school in the United States within the past five years;
127 (5) Ensure that the legal counsel for the charter
128 school shall report directly to the charter school's
129 governing board; and
130 (6) Provide a process to ensure that the expenditures
131 that the education service provider intends to bill to the
132 charter school shall receive prior approval of the governing
133 board or its designee.
134 8. A charter school may enter into contracts with
135 community partnerships and state agencies acting in
136 collaboration with such partnerships that provide services
137 to students and their families linked to the school.
138 9. A charter school shall be eligible for
139 transportation state aid pursuant to section 163.161 and
140 shall be free to contract with the local district, or any
141 other entity, for the provision of transportation to the
142 students of the charter school.
143 10. (1) The proportionate share of state and federal
144 resources generated by students with disabilities or staff
145 serving them shall be paid in full to charter schools
146 enrolling those students by their school district where such
147 enrollment is through a contract for services described in
148 this section. The proportionate share of money generated
149 under other federal or state categorical aid programs shall
150 be directed to charter schools serving such students
151 eligible for that aid.

SB 1483 9
152 (2) A charter school shall provide the special
153 services provided pursuant to section 162.705 and may
154 provide the special services pursuant to a contract with a
155 school district or any provider of such services. For
156 students served in special districts established under
157 sections 162.815 to 162.940 in a county with more than one
158 million inhabitants, such students shall be included in the
159 weighted membership and weighted average daily attendance
160 counts of the special district as provided in section
161 163.011.
162 11. A charter school shall not charge tuition or
163 impose fees that a school district is prohibited from
164 charging or imposing, except that a charter school may
165 receive tuition payments from districts in the same or an
166 adjoining county for nonresident students who transfer to an
167 approved charter school, as defined in section 167.895, from
168 an unaccredited district.
169 12. A charter school is authorized to incur debt in
170 anticipation of receipt of funds. A charter school may also
171 borrow to finance facilities and other capital items. A
172 school district may incur bonded indebtedness or take other
173 measures to provide for physical facilities and other
174 capital items for charter schools that it sponsors or
175 contracts with. Except as otherwise specifically provided
176 in sections 160.400 to 160.425, upon the dissolution of a
177 charter school, any liabilities of the corporation will be
178 satisfied through the procedures of chapter 355. A charter
179 school shall satisfy all its financial obligations within
180 twelve months of notice from the sponsor of the charter
181 school's closure under subsection 8 of section 160.405.
182 After satisfaction of all its financial obligations, a
183 charter school shall return any remaining state and federal

SB 1483 10
184 funds to the department of elementary and secondary
185 education for disposition as stated in subdivision (17) of
186 subsection 1 of section 160.405. The department of
187 elementary and secondary education may withhold funding at a
188 level the department determines to be adequate during a
189 school's last year of operation until the department
190 determines that school records, liabilities, and reporting
191 requirements, including a full audit, are satisfied.
192 13. Charter schools shall not have the power to
193 acquire property by eminent domain.
194 14. The governing board of a charter school is
195 authorized to accept grants, gifts or donations of any kind
196 and to expend or use such grants, gifts or donations. A
197 grant, gift or donation shall not be accepted by the
198 governing board if it is subject to any condition contrary
199 to law applicable to the charter school or other public
200 schools, or contrary to the terms of the charter.
201 15. In addition to any state aid remitted to charter
202 schools under this section, the department of elementary and
203 secondary education shall remit to any charter school an
204 amount equal to the weighted average daily attendance of the
205 charter school multiplied by the difference of:
206 (1) The amount of state aid and local aid per weighted
207 average daily attendance received by the school district in
208 which the charter school is located, not including any funds
209 remitted to charter schools in the district. For the
210 purposes of this subdivision, the weighted average daily
211 attendance of the school district shall not include the
212 weighted average daily attendance of the charter schools
213 located in the district; and

SB 1483 11
214 (2) The amount of state aid and local aid per weighted
215 average daily attendance of the charter school received by
216 the charter school.
217 16. Charter schools may adjust weighted average daily
218 attendance pursuant to section 163.036.
219 17. When calculating the amounts in subdivisions (1)
220 and (2) of subsection 15 of this section, the department
221 shall utilize the most current data to which the department
222 has access.
223 18. For the purposes of subsection 15 of this section:
224 (1) The definitions contained in section 163.011,
225 shall apply;
226 (2) The term "local aid" shall mean all local and
227 county revenue received, including, but not limited to, the
228 following:
229 (a) Property taxes and delinquent taxes;
230 (b) Merchants' and manufacturers' tax revenues;
231 (c) Financial institutions' tax revenues;
232 (d) City sales tax revenue, including city sales tax
233 collected in any city not within a county;
234 (e) Payments in lieu of taxes; and
235 (f) Revenues from state-assessed railroad and
236 utilities tax;
237 (3) The term local aid shall not be construed to
238 include:
239 (a) Charitable contributions, gifts, and grants made
240 to school districts;
241 (b) Interest earnings of school districts and student
242 fees paid to school districts;
243 (c) Debt service authorized by a public vote for the
244 purpose of making payments on a bond issuance of a school
245 district;

SB 1483 12
246 (d) Proposition C revenues received for school
247 purposes from the school district trust fund under section
248 163.087; or
249 (e) Any other funding solely intended for a particular
250 school district or their respective employees, schools,
251 foundations, or organizations;
252 (4) The term "state aid" shall mean any revenues
253 received pursuant to this section and sections 163.043 and
254 163.087.
255 19. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the
256 contrary, subsections 15 to 18 of this section shall be
257 applicable to charter schools operated only in the following
258 school districts, provided that no such school district
259 shall be located in a county with more than one hundred
260 fifty thousand but fewer than two hundred thousand
261 inhabitants:
262 (1) In a metropolitan school district;
263 (2) In an urban school district containing most or all
264 of a city with more than four hundred thousand inhabitants
265 and located in more than one county;
266 (3) In a school district that has been classified as
267 unaccredited by the state board of education;
268 (4) In a school district that has been classified as
269 provisionally accredited by the state board of education and
270 has received scores on its annual performance report
271 consistent with a classification of provisionally accredited
272 or unaccredited for three consecutive school years beginning
273 with the 2012-13 accreditation year under the conditions
274 described in paragraphs (a) and (b) of subdivision (4) of
275 subsection 2 of section 160.400; or
276 (5) In a school district that has been accredited
277 without provisions, sponsored only by the local school board

SB 1483 13
278 under the conditions described in subdivision (6) of
279 subsection 2 of section 160.400.
280 20. (1) The members of the governing board of a
281 charter school shall be residents of the state of Missouri.
282 (2) Any current member of a governing board of a
283 charter school who does not meet the requirements in
284 subdivision (1) of this subsection may complete their term.
285 Such individual shall not be renominated as a member of the
286 governing board on which he or she sits.
287 21. (1) Any charter school management company
288 operating a charter school in the state shall be a nonprofit
289 corporation incorporated pursuant to chapter 355.
290 (2) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
291 contrary, if a charter school is operated by a charter
292 school management company, all laws and regulations that
293 apply to employees of such charter school shall apply to the
294 actions of any employees of the management company while
295 they are conducting any work relating to the direct decision-
296 making of the operation of such charter school.
297 22. Beginning July 1, 2023, the provisions of section
298 160.995 shall be applicable to charter schools.
299 23. Each charter school shall publish its annual
300 performance report on the school's website in a downloadable
301 format.
162.301. 1. Within fourteen days after the
certification of the election of the first school board in
each seven-director district, other than an urban district,
and within fourteen days after the certification of each
annual election, the board shall meet. The newly elected
members shall qualify by taking the oath of office
prescribed by Article VII, Section 11, of the Constitution
of Missouri.

SB 1483 14
2. The board shall organize by the election of a
president and vice president, and the board shall, on or
before the fifteenth day of July of each year, elect a
secretary and a treasurer, who shall enter upon their
respective duties on the fifteenth day of July. The
secretary and treasurer may be or may not be members of the
board. [No compensation shall be granted to either the
secretary or the treasurer until his report and settlement
are made and filed or published as the law directs.]
3. A majority of the board constitutes a quorum for
the transaction of business, but no contract shall be let,
person employed, bill approved or warrant ordered unless a
majority of the whole board votes therefor, or unless a
majority of all members of the board votes to delegate
decision-making authority regarding such items to the
district superintendent. If such authority is so delegated,
the superintendent shall report to the board on a monthly
basis regarding all decisions made on such items.
162.411. The board of any district may retain counsel
when necessary to the exercise of its powers. [In all
school districts in this state which contain one or more
cities or towns having a total population of thirty thousand
inhabitants or over the school board may employ an attorney
on a retainer basis whenever the board finds it necessary to
do so and may prescribe his duties, compensation and term of
office, which shall not exceed one year.]
162.511. Except as provided in laws specifically
applicable to urban districts the board in any urban
district shall perform the same duties and be subject to the
same restrictions and liabilities as the school boards of
other school districts acting under the general school laws
of the state. A majority of the board constitutes a quorum

SB 1483 15
for the transaction of business. No contract shall be let,
teacher employed, bill approved or warrant ordered unless a
majority of the board shall vote therefor[, but this
provision does not apply to the reemployment of any
teacher. It]; except that, a majority of all members of the
board may vote to delegate decision-making authority
regarding such items to the district superintendent. If
such authority is so delegated, the superintendent shall
report to the board on a monthly basis regarding all
decisions made on such items. The board shall provide and
keep a corporate seal.
162.531. The secretary of the board of each urban
district shall keep a record of the proceedings of the
board; he shall also keep a record of all warrants drawn
upon the treasurer, showing the date and amount of each, in
whose favor and upon what account it was drawn[, and shall
also keep a register of the bonded indebtedness of the
school district]; he shall also perform other duties
required of him by the board, and shall safely keep [all
bonds or other] papers entrusted to his care. He shall,
before entering upon his duties, execute a bond to the
school district in the penal sum of not less than five
thousand dollars, the amount thereof to be fixed by the
board, with at least one surety, to be approved by the board.
162.700. 1. The board of education of each school
district and charter school in this state, except school
districts and charter schools which are part of a special
school district, and the board of education of each special
school district shall provide special educational services
for children with disabilities three years of age or more
residing in the district as required by P.L. 99-457, as
codified and as may be amended. Any child, determined to be

SB 1483 16
a child with disabilities, shall be eligible for such
services upon reaching his or her third birthday and state
school funds shall be apportioned accordingly. This
subsection shall apply to each full school year beginning on
or after July 1, 1991. In the event that federal funding
fails to be appropriated at the authorized level as
described in 20 U.S.C. Section 1419(b)(2), the
implementation of this subsection relating to services for
children with disabilities three and four years of age may
be delayed until such time as funds are appropriated to meet
such level. Each local school district and each special
school district shall be responsible to engage in a planning
process to design the service delivery system necessary to
provide special education and related services for children
three and four years of age with disabilities. The planning
process shall include public, private, and private not-for-
profit agencies which have provided such services for this
population. The school district, or school districts, or
special school district, shall be responsible for designing
an efficient service delivery system which uses the present
resources of the local community which may be funded by the
department of elementary and secondary education or the
department of mental health. School districts may
coordinate with public, private, and private not-for-profit
agencies presently in existence. The service delivery
system shall be consistent with the requirements of the
department of elementary and secondary education to provide
appropriate special education services in the least
restrictive environment.
2. Every local school district or, if a special
district is in operation, every special school district
shall obtain current appropriate diagnostic reports for each

SB 1483 17
child with disabilities prior to assignment in a special
program. These records may be obtained with parental
permission from previous medical or psychological
evaluation, may be provided by competent personnel of such
district or special district, or may be secured by such
district from competent and qualified medical,
psychological, or other professional personnel.
3. Evaluations of private school students suspected of
having a disability under the Individuals With Disabilities
Education Act will be conducted as appropriate by the school
district in which the private school is located or its
contractor.
4. Where special districts have been formed to serve
children with disabilities under the provisions of sections
162.670 to 162.974, such children shall be educated in
programs of the special district, except that component
districts may provide education programs for children with
disabilities ages three and four inclusive in accordance
with regulations and standards adopted by the state board of
education.
5. For the purposes of this act, remedial reading
programs are not a special educational service as defined by
subdivision (4) of section 162.675.
6. Any and all state costs required to fund special
education services for three- and four-year-old children
under this section shall be provided for by a specific,
separate appropriation and shall not be funded by a
reallocation of money appropriated for the public school
foundation program.
7. School districts providing early childhood special
education shall give consideration to the value of
continuing services with Part C early intervention system

SB 1483 18
providers for the remainder of the school year when
developing an individualized education program for a student
who has received services under Part C of the Individuals
with Disabilities Education Act and reaches the age of three
years during a regular school year. Services provided shall
be only those permissible according to Section 619 of the
Individuals with Disabilities Education Act.
8. (1) A student whose age makes the student eligible
for kindergarten or grade one may continue eligibility as a
young child with a developmental delay if the student was
identified as a young child with a developmental delay
before attaining eligibility for kindergarten.
(2) The category of young child with a developmental
delay shall not be used to determine continuing eligibility
for special educational services for a student who is seven
years of age before August first of a given school year, but
eligibility for special educational services may be
determined for such students through any other disability
category.
9. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is
defined in section 536.010, that is created under the
authority delegated in this section shall become effective
only if it complies with and is subject to all of the
provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section
536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and
if any of the powers vested with the general assembly under
chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date or to
100 disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held
101 unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority and
102 any rule proposed or adopted after August 28, 2002, shall be
103 invalid and void.

SB 1483 19
162.890. If a special district is organized in any
area of this state under the provisions of sections 162.670
to 162.995, neither the state board of education nor any
school district or charter school within the special
district shall be required to establish schools or classes
for the training or education of handicapped or severely
handicapped children under any other existing law, except
that the component districts included in a newly formed
special district, charter schools within a newly formed
special district, and the state board of education shall
continue to provide services formerly provided for children
residing in the district until the resources of the special
district are sufficient to permit its assuming such
responsibilities. In no instance shall charter schools,
component districts, or the state board of education be
required to provide special education classes for the
training or education of these children for more than one
school term after the special district has been formed.
163.011. As used in this chapter unless the context
requires otherwise:
(1) "Adjusted operating levy", the sum of tax rates
for the current year for teachers' and incidental funds for
a school district as reported to the proper officer of each
county pursuant to section 164.011;
(2) "Average daily attendance", the quotient or the
sum of the quotients obtained by dividing the total number
of hours attended in a term by resident pupils between the
ages of five and twenty-one by the actual number of hours
school was in session in that term. To the average daily
attendance of the following school term shall be added the
full-time equivalent average daily attendance of summer
school students. "Full-time equivalent average daily

SB 1483 20
attendance of summer school students" shall be computed by
dividing the total number of hours, except for physical
education hours that do not count as credit toward
graduation for students in grades nine, ten, eleven, and
twelve, attended by all summer school pupils by the number
of hours required in section 160.011 in the school term.
For purposes of determining average daily attendance under
this subdivision, the term "resident pupil" shall include
all children between the ages of five and twenty-one who are
residents of the school district and who are attending
kindergarten through grade twelve in such district. If a
child is attending school in a district other than the
district of residence and the child's parent is teaching in
the school district or is a regular employee of the school
district which the child is attending, then such child shall
be considered a resident pupil of the school district which
the child is attending for such period of time when the
district of residence is not otherwise liable for tuition.
Average daily attendance for students below the age of five
years for which a school district may receive state aid
based on such attendance shall be computed as regular school
term attendance unless otherwise provided by law;
(3) "Current operating expenditures":
(a) For the fiscal year 2007 calculation, current
operating expenditures shall be calculated using data from
fiscal year 2004 and shall be calculated as all expenditures
for instruction and support services except capital outlay
and debt service expenditures minus the revenue from federal
categorical sources; food service; student activities;
categorical payments for transportation costs pursuant to
section 163.161; state reimbursements for early childhood
special education; the career ladder entitlement for the

SB 1483 21
district, as provided for in sections 168.500 to 168.515;
the vocational education entitlement for the district, as
provided for in section 167.332; and payments from other
districts;
(b) In every fiscal year subsequent to fiscal year
2007, current operating expenditures shall be the amount in
paragraph (a) of this subdivision plus any increases in
state funding pursuant to sections 163.031 and 163.043
subsequent to fiscal year 2005, not to exceed five percent,
per recalculation, of the state revenue received by a
district in the 2004-05 school year from the foundation
formula, line 14, gifted, remedial reading, exceptional
pupil aid, fair share, and free textbook payments for any
district from the first preceding calculation of the state
adequacy target;
(4) "District's tax rate ceiling", the highest tax
rate ceiling in effect subsequent to the 1980 tax year or
any subsequent year. Such tax rate ceiling shall not
contain any tax levy for debt service;
(5) "Dollar-value modifier", an index of the relative
purchasing power of a dollar, calculated as one plus fifteen
percent of the difference of the regional wage ratio minus
one, provided that the dollar value modifier shall not be
applied at a rate less than 1.0:
(a) "County wage per job", the total county wage and
salary disbursements divided by the total county wage and
salary employment for each county and the City of St. Louis
as reported by the Bureau of Economic Analysis of the United
States Department of Commerce for the fourth year preceding
the payment year;
(b) "Regional wage per job":

SB 1483 22
a. The total Missouri wage and salary disbursements of
the metropolitan area as defined by the Office of Management
and Budget divided by the total Missouri metropolitan wage
and salary employment for the metropolitan area for the
county signified in the school district number or the City
of St. Louis, as reported by the Bureau of Economic Analysis
of the United States Department of Commerce for the fourth
year preceding the payment year and recalculated upon every
decennial census to incorporate counties that are newly
added to the description of metropolitan areas; or if no
such metropolitan area is established, then:
b. The total Missouri wage and salary disbursements of
the micropolitan area as defined by the Office of Management
and Budget divided by the total Missouri micropolitan wage
and salary employment for the micropolitan area for the
county signified in the school district number, as reported
by the Bureau of Economic Analysis of the United States
Department of Commerce for the fourth year preceding the
payment year, if a micropolitan area for such county has
been established and recalculated upon every decennial
census to incorporate counties that are newly added to the
description of micropolitan areas; or
100 c. If a county is not part of a metropolitan or
101 micropolitan area as established by the Office of Management
102 and Budget, then the county wage per job, as defined in
103 paragraph (a) of this subdivision, shall be used for the
104 school district, as signified by the school district number;
105 (c) "Regional wage ratio", the ratio of the regional
106 wage per job divided by the state median wage per job;
107 (d) "State median wage per job", the fifty-eighth
108 highest county wage per job;

SB 1483 23
109 (6) "Free and reduced price lunch pupil count", for
110 school districts not eligible for and those that do not
111 choose the USDA Community Eligibility Option, the number of
112 pupils eligible for free and reduced price lunch on the last
113 Wednesday in January for the preceding school year who were
114 enrolled as students of the district, as approved by the
115 department in accordance with applicable federal
116 regulations. For eligible school districts that choose the
117 USDA Community Eligibility Option, the free and reduced
118 price lunch pupil count shall be the percentage of free and
119 reduced price lunch students calculated as eligible on the
120 last Wednesday in January of the most recent school year
121 that included household applications to determine free and
122 reduced price lunch count multiplied by the district's
123 average daily attendance figure;
124 (7) "Free and reduced price lunch threshold" shall be
125 calculated by dividing the total free and reduced price
126 lunch pupil count of every performance district that falls
127 entirely above the bottom five percent and entirely below
128 the top five percent of average daily attendance, when such
129 districts are rank-ordered based on their current operating
130 expenditures per average daily attendance, by the total
131 average daily attendance of all included performance
132 districts;
133 (8) "Limited English proficiency pupil count", the
134 number in the preceding school year of pupils aged three
135 through twenty-one enrolled or preparing to enroll in an
136 elementary school or secondary school who were not born in
137 the United States or whose native language is a language
138 other than English or are Native American or Alaskan native,
139 or a native resident of the outlying areas, and come from an
140 environment where a language other than English has had a

SB 1483 24
141 significant impact on such individuals' level of English
142 language proficiency, or are migratory, whose native
143 language is a language other than English, and who come from
144 an environment where a language other than English is
145 dominant; and have difficulties in speaking, reading,
146 writing, or understanding the English language sufficient to
147 deny such individuals the ability to meet the state's
148 proficient level of achievement on state assessments
149 described in Public Law 107-10, the ability to achieve
150 successfully in classrooms where the language of instruction
151 is English, or the opportunity to participate fully in
152 society;
153 (9) "Limited English proficiency threshold" shall be
154 calculated by dividing the total limited English proficiency
155 pupil count of every performance district that falls
156 entirely above the bottom five percent and entirely below
157 the top five percent of average daily attendance, when such
158 districts are rank-ordered based on their current operating
159 expenditures per average daily attendance, by the total
160 average daily attendance of all included performance
161 districts;
162 (10) "Local effort":
163 (a) For the fiscal year 2007 calculation, local effort
164 shall be computed as the equalized assessed valuation of the
165 property of a school district in calendar year 2004 divided
166 by one hundred and multiplied by the performance levy less
167 the percentage retained by the county assessor and collector
168 plus one hundred percent of the amount received in fiscal
169 year 2005 for school purposes from intangible taxes, fines,
170 escheats, payments in lieu of taxes and receipts from state-
171 assessed railroad and utility tax, one hundred percent of
172 the amount received for school purposes pursuant to the

SB 1483 25
173 merchants' and manufacturers' taxes under sections 150.010
174 to 150.370, one hundred percent of the amounts received for
175 school purposes from federal properties under sections
176 12.070 and 12.080 except when such amounts are used in the
177 calculation of federal impact aid pursuant to P.L. 81-874,
178 fifty percent of Proposition C revenues received for school
179 purposes from the school district trust fund under section
180 163.087, and one hundred percent of any local earnings or
181 income taxes received by the district for school purposes.
182 Under this paragraph, for a special district established
183 under sections 162.815 to 162.940 in a county with a charter
184 form of government and with more than one million
185 inhabitants, a tax levy of zero shall be utilized in lieu of
186 the performance levy for the special school district;
187 (b) In every year subsequent to fiscal year 2007,
188 local effort shall be the amount calculated under paragraph
189 (a) of this subdivision plus any increase in the amount
190 received for school purposes from fines. If a district's
191 assessed valuation has decreased subsequent to the
192 calculation outlined in paragraph (a) of this subdivision,
193 the district's local effort shall be calculated using the
194 district's current assessed valuation in lieu of the
195 assessed valuation utilized in the calculation outlined in
196 paragraph (a) of this subdivision. When a change in a
197 school district's boundary lines occurs because of a
198 boundary line change, annexation, attachment, consolidation,
199 reorganization, or dissolution under section 162.071,
200 162.081, sections 162.171 to 162.201, section 162.221,
201 162.223, 162.431, 162.441, or 162.451, or in the event that
202 a school district assumes any territory from a district that
203 ceases to exist for any reason, the department of elementary
204 and secondary education shall make a proper adjustment to

SB 1483 26
205 each affected district's local effort, so that each
206 district's local effort figure conforms to the new boundary
207 lines of the district. The department shall compute the
208 local effort figure by applying the calendar year 2004
209 assessed valuation data to the new land areas resulting from
210 the boundary line change, annexation, attachment,
211 consolidation, reorganization, or dissolution and otherwise
212 follow the procedures described in this subdivision;
213 (11) "Membership" shall be the average of:
214 (a) The number of resident full-time students and the
215 full-time equivalent number of part-time students who were
216 enrolled in the public schools of the district on the last
217 Wednesday in September of the previous year and who were in
218 attendance one day or more during the preceding ten school
219 days; and
220 (b) The number of resident full-time students and the
221 full-time equivalent number of part-time students who were
222 enrolled in the public schools of the district on the last
223 Wednesday in January of the previous year and who were in
224 attendance one day or more during the preceding ten school
225 days, plus the full-time equivalent number of summer school
226 pupils. "Full-time equivalent number of part-time students"
227 is determined by dividing the total number of hours for
228 which all part-time students are enrolled by the number of
229 hours in the school term. "Full-time equivalent number of
230 summer school pupils" is determined by dividing the total
231 number of hours for which all summer school pupils were
232 enrolled by the number of hours required pursuant to section
233 160.011 in the school term. Only students eligible to be
234 counted for average daily attendance shall be counted for
235 membership;

SB 1483 27
236 (12) "Operating levy for school purposes", the sum of
237 tax rates levied for teachers' and incidental funds plus the
238 operating levy or sales tax equivalent pursuant to section
239 162.1100 of any transitional school district containing the
240 school district, in the payment year, not including any
241 equalized operating levy for school purposes levied by a
242 special school district in which the district is located;
243 (13) "Performance district", any district that has met
244 performance standards and indicators as established by the
245 department of elementary and secondary education for
246 purposes of accreditation under section 161.092 and as
247 reported on the final annual performance report for that
248 district each year; for calculations to be utilized for
249 payments in fiscal years subsequent to fiscal year 2018, the
250 number of performance districts shall not exceed twenty-five
251 percent of all public school districts;
252 (14) "Performance levy", three dollars and forty-three
253 cents;
254 (15) "School purposes" pertains to teachers' and
255 incidental funds;
256 (16) "Special education pupil count", the number of
257 public school students with a current individualized
258 education program or services plan and receiving services
259 from the resident district as of December first of the
260 preceding school year, except for special education services
261 provided through a school district established under
262 sections 162.815 to 162.940 in a county with a charter form
263 of government and with more than one million inhabitants, in
264 which case the sum of the students in each district or
265 charter school within the county exceeding the special
266 education threshold of each respective district or charter
267 school within the county shall be counted within the special

SB 1483 28
268 district and not in the district of residence or in the
269 charter school for purposes of distributing the state aid
270 derived from the special education pupil count;
271 (17) "Special education threshold" shall be calculated
272 by dividing the total special education pupil count of every
273 performance district that falls entirely above the bottom
274 five percent and entirely below the top five percent of
275 average daily attendance, when such districts are rank-
276 ordered based on their current operating expenditures per
277 average daily attendance, by the total average daily
278 attendance of all included performance districts;
279 (18) "State adequacy target", the sum of the current
280 operating expenditures of every performance district that
281 falls entirely above the bottom five percent and entirely
282 below the top five percent of average daily attendance, when
283 such districts are rank-ordered based on their current
284 operating expenditures per average daily attendance, divided
285 by the total average daily attendance of all included
286 performance districts. The department of elementary and
287 secondary education shall first calculate the state adequacy
288 target for fiscal year 2007 and recalculate the state
289 adequacy target every two years using the most current
290 available data. The recalculation shall never result in a
291 decrease from the state adequacy target as calculated for
292 fiscal years 2017 and 2018 and any state adequacy target
293 figure calculated subsequent to fiscal year 2018. Should a
294 recalculation result in an increase in the state adequacy
295 target amount, fifty percent of that increase shall be
296 included in the state adequacy target amount in the year of
297 recalculation, and fifty percent of that increase shall be
298 included in the state adequacy target amount in the
299 subsequent year. The state adequacy target may be adjusted

SB 1483 29
300 to accommodate available appropriations as provided in
301 subsection 7 of section 163.031;
302 (19) "Teacher", any teacher, teacher-secretary,
303 substitute teacher, supervisor, principal, supervising
304 principal, superintendent or assistant superintendent,
305 school nurse, social worker, counselor or librarian who
306 shall, regularly, teach or be employed for no higher than
307 grade twelve more than one-half time in the public schools
308 and who is certified under the laws governing the
309 certification of teachers in Missouri;
310 (20) "Weighted average daily attendance":
311 (a) For fiscal years prior to the 2026 fiscal year,
312 paragraph (g) of this subdivision;
313 (b) For the 2026 fiscal year, the sum of nine-tenths
314 multiplied by paragraph (g) of this subdivision plus one-
315 tenth multiplied by the weighted membership;
316 (c) For the 2027 fiscal year, the sum of eight-tenths
317 multiplied by paragraph (g) of this subdivision plus two-
318 tenths multiplied by the weighted membership;
319 (d) For the 2028 fiscal year, the sum of seven-tenths
320 multiplied by paragraph (g) of this subdivision plus three-
321 tenths multiplied by the weighted membership;
322 (e) For the 2029 fiscal year, the sum of six-tenths
323 multiplied by paragraph (g) of this subdivision plus four-
324 tenths multiplied by the weighted membership;
325 (f) For the 2030 fiscal year and all subsequent fiscal
326 years, the sum of five-tenths multiplied by paragraph (g) of
327 this subdivision plus five-tenths multiplied by the weighted
328 membership;
329 (g) The average daily attendance plus the product of
330 twenty-five hundredths multiplied by the free and reduced
331 price lunch pupil count that exceeds the free and reduced

SB 1483 30
332 price lunch threshold, plus the product of seventy-five
333 hundredths multiplied by the number of special education
334 pupil count that exceeds the special education threshold,
335 plus the product of six-tenths multiplied by the number of
336 limited English proficiency pupil count that exceeds the
337 limited English proficiency threshold. For special
338 districts established under sections 162.815 to 162.940 in a
339 county with a charter form of government and with more than
340 one million inhabitants, weighted average daily attendance
341 shall be the average daily attendance plus the product of
342 twenty-five hundredths multiplied by the free and reduced
343 price lunch pupil count that exceeds the free and reduced
344 price lunch threshold, plus the product of seventy-five
345 hundredths multiplied by the sum of the special education
346 pupil count that exceeds the threshold for each county
347 district and charter school, plus the product of six-tenths
348 multiplied by the limited English proficiency pupil count
349 that exceeds the limited English proficiency threshold.
350 None of the districts or charter schools comprising a
351 special district established under sections 162.815 to
352 162.940 in a county with a charter form of government and
353 with more than one million inhabitants, shall use any
354 special education pupil count in calculating their weighted
355 average daily attendance;
356 (21) "Weighted membership", the membership plus the
357 product of twenty-five hundredths multiplied by the free and
358 reduced price lunch pupil count that exceeds the free and
359 reduced price lunch threshold, plus the product of seventy-
360 five hundredths multiplied by the number of special
361 education pupil count that exceeds the special education
362 threshold, plus the product of six-tenths multiplied by the
363 number of limited English proficiency pupil count that

SB 1483 31
364 exceeds the limited English proficiency threshold. For
365 special districts established under sections 162.815 to
366 162.940 in a county with more than one million inhabitants,
367 weighted membership shall be the membership plus the product
368 of twenty-five hundredths multiplied by the free and reduced
369 price lunch pupil count that exceeds the free and reduced
370 price lunch threshold, plus the product of seventy-five
371 hundredths multiplied by the sum of the special education
372 pupil count that exceeds the threshold for each county
373 district and charter school, plus the product of six-tenths
374 multiplied by the limited English proficiency pupil count
375 that exceeds the limited English proficiency threshold.
376 None of the districts or charter schools comprising a
377 special district established under sections 162.815 to
378 162.940 in a county with more than one million inhabitants
379 shall use any special education pupil count in calculating
380 their weighted membership.
164.131. 1. In urban districts, the board may borrow
money and issue bonds for the payment thereof for the
following purposes:
(1) Purchasing sites for schoolhouses, public library
buildings, art galleries, museums, janitors' houses, repair
buildings and supply houses used in the operation and
maintenance of schools and other land for school purposes;
(2) Erecting schoolhouses, library buildings, art
galleries, museums, janitors' houses, repair buildings,
supply houses and other buildings used in the operation and
maintenance of schools;
(3) Building additions to, remodeling and
reconstructing buildings existing at the time of making the
loan;
(4) Furnishing any building erected or reconstructed;

SB 1483 32
(5) Purchasing school buses and other transportation
equipment.
2. The question of the loan shall be decided at an
election.
3. Notice of the submission of the question shall
[include the amount of the loan required, and for what
purpose] contain the information required under sections
115.125 to 115.129. The president and secretary shall sign
the notices.
164.161. The loans authorized by sections 164.121 to
164.141 shall not be contracted for a longer period than
twenty years, and the entire amount of the loans shall at no
time exceed, including the present indebtedness of the
district, the maximum aggregate percentage, as set forth in
Article VI, Section 26(b) of the Missouri Constitution, of
the value of taxable tangible property therein as shown by
the last completed assessment for state and county
purposes. The rate of interest upon the bonds shall, in no
case, exceed the highest [legal] rate allowed [by contract]
under section 108.170. Before or at the time of issuing the
bonds, the board of directors shall provide for the
collection of an annual tax sufficient to pay the interest
and principal of the bonds as they fall due, and to retire
them within twenty years from date contracted.
164.191. The board of any school district may issue
funding and refunding bonds for the district, in accordance
with sections 108.140 to 108.170. Each bond shall be signed
by the manual or facsimile signature of the president,
countersigned by the manual or facsimile signature of the
clerk and authenticated by the seal of the school board, if
there is one[; and shall also be attested by the clerk of
the county commission of the county in which the district is

SB 1483 33
located, and he shall put the seal of the commission on each
bond. The clerk of the board shall keep a record in the
books of the school district of all renewal bonds issued by
the board, noting the date when issued and when due, and
also the number and amount of each bond so issued, and shall
also keep a full record of all transactions that may be
necessary for the identification of the bonds].
164.201. No refunding or renewal bond shall be
[exchanged by the board of any school district for any
outstanding bond for a sum less than ninety cents on the
dollar of its face value. The board also may sell the
refunding or renewal bonds for cash if in its judgment it
will be to the interest of the school district; but no
commission shall be allowed or cost incurred in the exchange
or sale of bonds which will reduce the net proceeds of the
same to a less amount than ninety cents on the dollar] sold
at a price less than permitted under section 108.170, and
all sums of money realized from the sale of refunding or
renewal bonds shall be used [in the redemption] to redeem,
retire, or provide for an escrow account for the redemption
or payment of outstanding bonds of the school district and
for the payment of costs of issuance of such refunding or
renewal bonds.
164.261. 1. Revenue bonds issued under section
164.231 shall be of such denomination, shall bear such rate
of interest not to exceed [four percent per annum] the
maximum rate permitted under section 108.170, and shall
mature at such time within twenty years from the date of
issuance thereof as the board of directors of the school
district determines. The bonds may be either serial bonds
or term bonds. Serial bonds may be issued with or without
reservation of the right to call them for payment or

SB 1483 34
redemption in advance of their maturity, upon the giving of
notice and with or without the covenant requiring the
payment of a premium in the event of the call and redemption
prior to maturity as the board determines. Term bonds shall
contain a reservation of the right to call them for payment
and redemption prior to maturity at such time and upon the
giving of notice and upon the payment of such premium, if
any, as the school board determines. Each such bond shall
bear on its face a prominent legend reading substantially as
follows:
"THIS IS A REVENUE BOND ONLY AND THE HOLDER
THEREOF SHALL NEVER HAVE ANY RIGHT TO DEMAND OR
RECEIVE PAYMENT OF THE PRINCIPAL OR INTEREST
THEREOF FROM ANY FUNDS RAISED OR TO BE RAISED BY
TAXATION."
2. The bonds when issued and sold shall be negotiable
instruments within the meaning of the law merchant and the
negotiable instruments law and the interest thereon is
exempt from income taxes under the laws of the state of
Missouri.
3. The bonds when issued may be sold at public sale to
brokers or others after giving such reasonable notice of the
sale as is determined by the board, but, if sold to brokers
or dealers for resale, they shall be sold for not less than
ninety-eight percent of the par value thereof and accrued
interest, or the board may, in its discretion, provide for
the sale of the bonds pursuant to individual subscriptions
therefor by purchasers for investment, in which case they
shall not be sold for less than the par value thereof and
accrued interest. The school board may, however, pay
reasonable compensation to persons employed in soliciting or
effecting such private subscriptions and purchases.

SB 1483 35
164.301. 1. The revenue bonds issued pursuant to the
provisions of sections 164.231 to 164.301 may be refunded in
whole or in part as provided in sections 108.140 to 108.170,
and in addition in any of the following circumstances, to
wit:
(1) When any of the bonds have by their terms become
due and payable and there are not sufficient funds in the
interest and sinking fund provided for their payment to pay
the bonds and the interest thereon;
(2) When any of the bonds are by their terms callable
for payment and redemption in advance of their date of
maturity and have been duly called for payment and
redemption;
(3) When any of the bonds are voluntarily surrendered
by the holder thereof in exchange for refunding bonds.
2. For the purpose of refunding any bonds issued
hereunder, including refunding bonds, the board of the
school district may make and issue refunding bonds in the
amount necessary to pay off and redeem the bonds to be
refunded, together with unpaid and past due interest thereon
and any premium which is due under the terms of the bonds,
together also with the cost of issuing the refunding bonds,
and may sell the bonds in like manner as is herein provided
for the sale of revenue bonds. With the proceeds of the
bonds, the board may pay off, redeem and cancel old bonds
and coupons which have matured, or which have been called
for payment and redemption, together with the past due
interest premium, if any, due thereon, or the bonds may be
issued and delivered in exchange for a like par value amount
of bonds to refund which the refunding bonds were issued.
3. No refunding bonds issued pursuant to the
provisions of this section shall be payable in more than

SB 1483 36
twenty years from the date thereof or shall bear interest at
a rate in excess of [six percent per annum] the maximum rate
permitted under section 108.170.
4. Refunding bonds are payable from the same sources
as were pledged to the payment of the bonds refunded thereby
and, in the discretion of the board, may be payable from any
other sources which under sections 164.231 to 164.301 may be
pledged to the payment of revenue bonds issued hereunder.
165.141. 1. The notes shall be known as tax
anticipation notes of the school district and shall be
signed by the president of the school board and attested by
the clerk or secretary. The clerk or secretary of the
school board shall certify on the back of each note that the
note is issued pursuant to an order of the school board of
the district and the aggregate principal amount of all prior
notes and warrants issued against the fund referred to in
the note which are unpaid at the date of the certificate.
[All notes issued under this section and section 165.131
shall be registered, without fee, before delivery in the
office of the county treasurer of the county in which the
school district lies. The registry] Each note shall show
the number, date, amount and interest rate of each note, the
fund for which issued, date of sale and name of the payee,
if any, [or of the purchaser if payable to bearer. Upon
payment and cancellation the notes shall be submitted to the
county treasurer who shall record the date of payment and
cancellation in his record of registry] and of the district
treasurer or bank or trust company acting as paying agent
and note registrar.
2. The secretary of the school district shall keep
true and correct record of the issuance, and of the fact and
date of payment of all notes, and deliver a duplicate

SB 1483 37
thereof to the treasurer of the school district. [The notes
upon payment shall be cancelled and] It shall not be lawful
for the school district to purchase and reissue any of the
notes.
170.014. 1. This section shall be known as the
"Reading Instruction Act" and is enacted to ensure that all
public schools including charter schools establish reading
programs in kindergarten through grade five based in
scientific research. "Evidence-based reading instruction"
includes practices that have been proven effective through
evaluation of the outcomes for large numbers of students and
are highly likely to be effective in improving reading if
implemented with fidelity. Such programs shall include the
essential components of phonemic awareness, phonics,
fluency, vocabulary, and comprehension, and all new teachers
who teach reading in kindergarten through grade three shall
receive adequate training in these areas.
2. (1) For purposes of this subsection, "three-cueing
system" means any model of teaching students to read based
on meaning, structure and syntax, and visual cues, which may
also be known as "MSV".
(2) A public school district or charter school shall
provide reading instruction in accordance with the following
requirements:
(a) Phonics instruction for decoding and encoding
shall be the primary instructional strategy for teaching
word reading; and
(b) Instruction in word reading shall not rely
primarily on strategies based on the three-cueing system
model of reading or visual memory[; and
(c) Reading instruction may include visual information
and strategies that improve background and experiential

SB 1483 38
knowledge, add context, and increase oral language and
vocabulary to support comprehension, but such visual
information and strategies shall not be used to teach word
reading].
3. Every public school in the state shall offer a
reading program as described in subsection 1 of this section
for kindergarten through grade five.
177.073. 1. The board of directors or school board in
urban school districts, metropolitan school districts, and
school districts located totally or partially within a first
class charter county adjoining a city not within a county,
by an affirmative vote of [not less than two-thirds of all
the members] a majority of all members of the board, may:
(1) Select, direct and authorize the purchase of sites
for and authorize the construction of [libraries, schools,
school offices, art galleries and museums; and the necessary
janitors' houses, repair buildings, supply houses and
parking] facilities to be used in the operation and
maintenance of the schools;
(2) Authorize and direct the purchase of additional
ground needed for school purposes;
(3) (a) Authorize and direct the sale and transfer or
lease of any real or personal property belonging to the
district which is not required for operation of the school
program and which the superintendent or the superintendent's
designee has determined has reasonable value after factoring
in the time and costs associated with advertising and
processing the sale, transfer, or lease. All property the
superintendent or designee determines does not have
reasonable value shall be recycled, destroyed, or disposed
of as solid waste.

SB 1483 39
(b) The board may, by an affirmative vote of a
majority of all members of the board, transfer district
personal property for no compensation or negotiated
compensation to students of the district or to another
public school district in the state that is in need of the
property. Personal property shall not otherwise be
transferred without compensation unless the district has
first attempted to sell the property and has not received
any bids for the property.
(c) Personal property shall be sold or leased to the
highest bidder. The proceeds from the sale of personal
property shall be placed to the credit of the incidental
fund.
(d) Real property may be sold or leased by listing the
property with one or more real estate brokers licensed by
the state of Missouri and paying a commission upon such sale
or lease. Real property not sold or leased through a real
estate broker [and all personal property] shall be sold or
leased to the highest bidder[, except that any real or
personal school property may be sold or leased to a
community group or a city, state agency, municipal
corporation, or any other governmental subdivision of the
state located wholly or partially within the boundaries of
the district, for public uses and purposes, at such sum as
may be agreed upon between the school district and the
community group or the city, state agency, municipal
corporation, or other governmental subdivision of the
state]. If property is to be leased by bid, written
proposals for lease terms shall be submitted by potential
lessees. The lease proposal offering the most economically
advantageous terms shall be considered the highest lease
bid. A purchase proposal may include contingencies; the

SB 1483 40
proposal offering the most economically advantageous terms
shall be the highest bid. All bids for purchase or lease of
real property shall be submitted formally as closed bids.
Bids shall be opened at a meeting, which shall be an open
meeting. The board may reject all bids, or negotiate an
acceptable sale or lease with the highest bidder, if all
bids are unsatisfactory. The records of the bid-opening
meeting shall be an open record. If real property is not
sold or leased through a real estate broker, notice that the
board is holding real property for sale or offering it for
lease, including a planned sale or lease to a community
group or a city, state agency, municipal corporation, or
other governmental subdivision of the state, shall be given
by publication in a newspaper within the county in which all
or a part of the district is located which has general
circulation within the district, once a week for two
consecutive weeks, the last publication to be at least seven
days and not more than fourteen days prior to the date of
the bid opening. The term of a lease may be for any period
which the board finds is advantageous and meets the needs of
the district. The lease or deed of conveyance shall be
executed by the president and attested by the secretary of
the board. If the district has a seal, it shall be affixed
to the deed or lease. The proceeds derived from sale of
real property shall be placed to the credit of the
incidental fund of the district. [The proceeds from sale of
nonrealty and from leases shall be placed to the credit of
the incidental fund.]
(e) Notwithstanding any provision of paragraph (c) or
(d) of this subdivision to the contrary, a district may sell
real or personal property to a community group or a city,
state agency, municipal corporation, or any other political

SB 1483 41
subdivision of the state by posting public notice of the
proposed sale and the agreed-upon purchase price of the
property. Such notice shall be posted at the primary
offices of the school district and the governmental entity
and on the websites of the school district and of the
governmental entity, if such websites exist. The district
may also use other methods of advertisement it determines
are effective.
2. The board may receive, in behalf of the school
district, any grants, gifts, or devises made for the benefit
of the district or its schools, or any public library, art
100 gallery or museum under the control of the board.
177.086. 1. Any school district authorizing the
construction of facilities which may exceed an expenditure
of fifty thousand dollars shall publicly advertise, once a
week for two consecutive weeks, in a newspaper of general
circulation, qualified pursuant to chapter 493, located
within the city in which the school district is located, or
if there be no such newspaper, in a qualified newspaper of
general circulation in the county, or if there be no such
newspaper, in a qualified newspaper of general circulation
in an adjoining county, and may advertise in business,
trade, or minority newspapers and websites, for bids on said
construction. The advertisement shall include, or direct
potential bidders to, the complete invitation for bids
including the project specifications and terms and
conditions established for the project.
2. No bids shall be entertained by the school district
which are not made in accordance with the specifications
furnished by the district and all contracts shall be let to
the lowest responsible bidder complying with the terms of

SB 1483 42
the letting, provided that the district shall have the right
to reject any and all bids.
3. All bids must be submitted sealed and in writing,
to be opened publicly at time and place of the district's
choosing.
4. The requirements of this section are not applicable
if the district utilizes a cooperative procurement service
authorized under section 34.046, state procurement service
authorized under section 67.360, design-build service
authorized under section 67.5060, or any other procurement
mechanism or source selection process authorized under state
or federal law that implements an approach to competitive
bidding that differs from the provisions of this section.
The requirements of sections 290.210 to 290.340 shall apply
to all construction projects governed by any such state or
federal law.
177.091. 1. The school board in each seven-director
district, as soon as sufficient funds are provided, shall
establish an adequate number of elementary schools, and if
the demands of the district require more than one elementary
school building, the board shall divide the district into
elementary school wards and fix the boundaries thereof. The
board shall select and procure a site in each ward and erect
and furnish a suitable school building thereon.
2. The board may also establish high schools and may
select and procure sites and erect and furnish buildings
therefor.
3. The board may acquire additional grounds when
needed for school purposes. If the directors of both school
districts involved agree, such grounds may be located
outside of the boundaries of the district and operated for
school purposes.

SB 1483 43
4. If there is any real or personal school property,
the ownership of which is vested in the district, that is no
longer required for the use of the district, and that the
superintendent or the superintendent's designee determines
has reasonable value, the board, by an affirmative vote of a
majority of the whole board, may authorize and direct the
sale or lease of the property, except that, property outside
the boundaries of the school district may not be leased.
All property the superintendent or designee determines does
not have reasonable value shall be recycled, destroyed, or
disposed of as solid waste.
5. The board may, by an affirmative vote of a majority
of all members of the board, transfer district personal
property for no compensation or negotiated compensation to
students of the district or to another public school
district in the state. Except as provided in this
subsection, personal property shall not be transferred
without compensation unless the district has first attempted
to sell the property and has not received any bids for the
property.
6. Real property may be sold or leased by listing the
property with one or more real estate brokers licensed by
the state of Missouri and paying a commission upon such sale
or lease. Real property not sold or leased through a real
estate broker [and all personal property, unless sold or
leased to a public institution of higher education,] shall
be sold or leased to the highest bidder. If real property
is not sold or leased through a real estate broker, notice
that the board is holding the property for sale or offering
it for lease shall be given by publication in a newspaper
within the county in which all or a part of the district is
located which has general circulation within the district,

SB 1483 44
once a week for two consecutive weeks, the last publication
to be at least seven days prior to the sale or lease of the
property[; except that, any real or personal school property
may be sold or leased to a city, state agency, municipal
corporation, or other governmental subdivision of the state
located within the boundaries of the district, for public
uses and purposes, by the giving of public notice as herein
provided and at such sum as may be agreed upon between the
school district and the city, state agency, municipal
corporation, or other governmental subdivision of the state].
7. Personal property shall be sold or leased to the
highest bidder. The school district shall post public
notice of the sale at the primary office of the school
district and on the website of the school district, if such
a website exists. The district may also use other methods
of advertisement it determines are effective.
8. Notwithstanding any provision of subsection 6 or 7
of this section to the contrary, a district may sell real or
personal property to a community group or a city, state
agency, municipal corporation, or other political
subdivision of the state by posting public notice of the
proposed sale and the amount agreed upon. Such notice shall
be posted at the primary offices of the school district and
of the governmental entity and on the websites of the school
district and the governmental entity, if such websites
exist. The district may also use other methods of
advertisement it determines are effective.
9. The lease or deed of conveyance shall be executed
by the president and attested by the secretary of the
board. If the district has a seal, it shall be affixed to
the deed or lease. The proceeds derived from the sale of
real property or nonrealty by districts identified as

SB 1483 45
financially stressed pursuant to section 161.520 shall[,
until July 1, 1998, be placed to the credit of the
incidental fund or the capital projects fund of the
district, with notice of any such sale to be included in the
budget and education plan submitted to the department of
elementary and secondary education, and, on and after July
1, 1998, any such proceeds shall] be placed to the credit of
the capital projects fund. [The proceeds from the sale of
real property or nonrealty and from leases, by any other
district, shall be placed to the credit of the capital
projects fund.
5. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection 4 of
this section to the contrary, after twenty-five years from
the date of purchase, any city of the fourth classification
with more than four hundred but fewer than five hundred
inhabitants and located in any county of the fourth
classification with more than thirty-two thousand nine
hundred but fewer than thirty-three thousand inhabitants
located within the boundaries of a school district that has
100 purchased any real or personal school property from the
101 school district for public uses and purposes, as provided in
102 subsection 4 of this section, may sell the property or use
103 the property for whatever purpose such city deems necessary.
104 6.] 10. The school board of a seven-director district
105 may also list real property for sale on which a building has
106 been constructed by an approved vocational education class
107 with a real estate broker licensed by the state of Missouri
108 and pay a commission thereon.
109 [7.] 11. Other provisions of this section to the
110 contrary notwithstanding, bids for the purchase of any
111 building constructed by students as part of an approved

SB 1483 46
112 vocational education class may be accepted prior to
113 completion of such construction.
[164.221. Whenever any bonds of any school
district are redeemed or paid off, the bonds
shall be burned or shredded in the presence of
two members of the school board and two other
credible persons as witnesses of the fact. The
secretary or clerk of the board shall record in
the books of the district a description of the
bonds so destroyed by noting the date when
issued and when due, and the number and amount
of each of the bonds, and the names of the
members of the board and of the witnesses who
are present at the burning of the bonds.]
✓